apertium-sme-smj.smj.dix
    <pardef n="prosj/ækta__N">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktan</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtadagi</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtajn</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtajnimme</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="PxDu1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtajnihtte</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="PxDu2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtajniska</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="PxDu3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtajnam</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="PxSg1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtajnat</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="PxSg2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtajnis</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="PxSg3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtajnimme</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="PxPl1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtajnihtte</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="PxPl2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtajnisá</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="PxPl3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtas</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtastimme</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="PxDu1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtastihtte</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="PxDu2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtastiska</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="PxDu3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtastam</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="PxSg1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtastat</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="PxSg2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtastis</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="PxSg3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtastimme</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="PxPl1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtastihtte</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="PxPl2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtastisá</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="PxPl3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktaj</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktasimme</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="PxDu1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktasihtte</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="PxDu2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktasiska</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="PxDu3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktasim</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="PxSg1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktasit</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="PxSg2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktasis</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="PxSg3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktasimme</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="PxPl1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktasihtte</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="PxPl2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktasisá</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="PxPl3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtan</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtanimme</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="PxDu1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtanihtte</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="PxDu2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtaniska</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="PxDu3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtanam</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="PxSg1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtanat</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="PxSg2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtanis</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="PxSg3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtanimme</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="PxPl1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtanihtte</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="PxPl2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtanisá</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="PxPl3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ækta</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktama</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="PxDu1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktada</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="PxDu2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktaska</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="PxDu3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktam</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="PxSg1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktat</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="PxSg2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktas</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="PxSg3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktama</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="PxPl1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktada</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="PxPl2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æktasa</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="PxPl3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evta</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtama</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="PxDu1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtada</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="PxDu2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtaska</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="PxDu3"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtam</l>
          <r>ækta<s n="N"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="PxSg1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evtat</l>

    <e lm="prosjækta"><i>prosj</i><par n="prosj/ækta__N"/></e>
